District of Columbia statutes.
22-1309

Throwing stones or other missiles.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons within the District of Columbia to throw any stone or other missile in any street, avenue, alley, road, or highway, or open space, or public square, or inclosure, or to throw any stone or other missile from any place into any street, avenue, road, or highway, alley, open space, public square, or inclosure, under a penalty of not more than $500 for every such offense.

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 322, ch. 320, § 3
July 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-206,§ 3, 55 DCR 5168
Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.
This section is referenced in § 22-1012.
1981 Ed., § 22-1109.
1973 Ed., § 22-1109.
D.C. Law 17-206 substituted “$500” for “five dollars”.